District of Columbia statutes.
47-1806.08b

Tax on residents and nonresidents — Refund of credit.

Repealed.

Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 302(b)(2), 49 DCR 1468
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-294, § 4, 54 DCR 1086
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 2302, 54 DCR 7052
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 4 of Targeted Historic Preservation Assistance Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-500, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 9046).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2302 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).